Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-334
Transportation network company insurance during application open stage; requirements.

(1) Beginning on September 1, 2015, the following requirements shall apply to transportation network company insurance during the application open stage:

(a) Transportation network company insurance shall be primary and in the amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars for death and personal injury per person, fifty thousand dollars for death and personal injury per incident, and twenty-five thousand dollars for property damage; and

(b) Uninsured motorist coverage pursuant to the Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act.

(2) The requirements for the coverage required by this section may be satisfied by any of the following:

(a) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a participating driver;

(b) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a transportation network company; or

(c) Any combination of subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section.

(3) The insurer providing transportation network company insurance under this section shall have the duty to defend and indemnify the insured.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 13.

Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act, see section 44-6401.